Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Telecommunications Services and Operations.

Sec. 44.21.300.
Telecommunications divisions. [Repealed, E.O. No. 66, § 6 (1987).]

Sec. 44.21.305.
Commissioner’s responsibility.

The commissioner shall

provide executive direction for the activities of the department related to telecommunications; and

assure that department activities in no way constitute an influence on the content or airing of programming, and report to the governor and the Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission any request or attempt by an employee of the state to influence the content or airing of program material.

History.

(E.O. No. 50 § 9 (1981); am E.O. No. 66 § 2 (1987))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.21.210. Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For division of information services, see 2 AAC 21.

Sec. 44.21.310.
Telecommunications powers and duties.

In accordance with the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner and with the departmental information systems plan, the department shall

advise the commissioner and the governor on matters of policy and comprehensive state planning for telecommunications services;

coordinate, manage, and supervise state programs in telecommunications, including the management of those telecommunication services for the state obtained from common carriers and from the communications industry;

when requested, provide technical and consulting assistance to the executive, judicial, and legislative branches of state government, to the University of Alaska, and to private noncommercial entities which request that assistance in facility procurement and leasing and in identifying long-range goals and objectives for the state and its political subdivisions in all aspects of telecommunications, including public, educational, and instructional telecommunications;

prepare and maintain a state comprehensive telecommunications development plan to further state telecommunications development and to meet state telecommunications needs and prepare and maintain a comprehensive inventory of all state communications facilities;

whenever feasible, procure services from private enterprise or certified and franchised utilities and contract for the construction, management, operation, and maintenance of telecommunications systems, and develop a procurement policy consistent with AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code); the procurement policy must seek to achieve the maximum benefit to the public, and methods of procurement, including lease, purchase, rental, or combinations of lease, purchase, and rental, must be selected on the basis of factors such as the ratio of long-range costs versus benefits, life cycle costing, and the costs to the communications industry to the extent that these costs may affect local and long distance basic telephone rates; procurement, contracting, construction, and maintenance under this paragraph is governed by AS 36.30;

provide information and assistance to state agencies to promote governmental coordination and unity in the preparation of agency plans and programs involving the use of telecommunications;

apply for and accept federal and private money, property, or assistance, that may be appropriated, granted, or otherwise made available to the department and use and disburse money and property for purposes consistent with AS

44.21.305

—

44.21.330

and AS

44.21.256

—

44.21.290

, subject to reasonable limitations imposed by the grantor;

participate with other governmental units in planning, and assist local governments and governmental conferences and councils in the state in planning and coordinating their activities relating to telecommunications;

provide for the orderly transition to new telecommunications services and systems by state agencies;

serve as a clearinghouse for information, data, and other materials that may be necessary or helpful to federal, state, or local governmental agencies in the development of telecommunication systems;

coordinate department services and activities with those of other state departments and agencies to the fullest extent possible to avoid unnecessary duplication; and

provide that all activities of the department are responsive to state statutes and regulations, and to the regulations and rulings of the Federal Communications Commission.

The department may

coordinate its functions with local, regional, state, and federal officials, private groups and individuals, and with officials of other countries, provinces, and states;

enter into contracts and subcontracts on behalf of the state to carry out the provisions of AS

44.21.305

— AS

44.21.330

;

act for the state in the initiation, investigation, and evaluation of, or participation in, programs related to the purposes of the department that involve more than one government or governmental unit;

on behalf of the state, apply for, accept, and expend gifts or grants made to the state if the gifts or grants are for the purposes of furthering the objectives of the department;

hold public hearings to obtain information for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of AS

44.21.305

—

44.21.330

; and

provide telecommunication services to commercial entities for television broadcast and charge for those services.

The department may not attempt to influence or affect the content or airing of program material.

History.

(E.O. No. 50 § 9 (1981); am § 42 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 53 SLA 1987; E.O. No. 66 § 3 (1987); am § 27 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 113 § 14 (2005))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.21.220. Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For division of information services, see 2 AAC 21.

Sec. 44.21.315.
Telecommunications services.

In accordance with the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner and with the departmental information systems plan, the department shall provide

technical consultation to educational and public telecommunications users;

coordination and support to telecommunications services for instruction, including technical assistance and assistance in preparation of applications for grants related to program development as may be requested by

public school districts and the Department of Education and Early Development;

the University of Alaska; and

other state agencies as approved by the commissioner;

coordination and support for health and safety-related functions, including the administrative and client services provided by state, federal, and private agencies;

coordination and support to telecommunications services for public participation in state-financed services, including the public hearing process, as may be statutorily required or otherwise appropriate;

assistance, through design, development, and promotion, to local school districts or other local and regional education agencies for the regionalization of instructional telecommunications services;

establishment of operational policies for public telecommunications services other than public broadcasting; and

assistance to the Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission and any commission-designated subcommitteees, as necessary to perform assigned department functions; the department shall cooperate with the commission and subcommittees in order to develop policies which are responsive to the user groups which are represented on the commission.

Subject to available funding, the department may make grants to educational and public telecommunication users except grants for public broadcasting purposes.

The department shall study, plan, and develop integrated instructional telecommunications services for all residents of the state and, after public hearings, submit to the governor and the legislature an annually updated long-term development plan prepared in consultation with the Department of Education and Early Development, the University of Alaska, local school districts, and other local and regional education areas.

The department shall, after public hearings, submit to the governor an annually updated long-term development plan for teleconferencing facilities and services, including facilities and services used both by state agencies and groups other than state agencies.

The department may not own, operate, or be the licensee of a public noncommercial broadcast station or production center.

Nothing in this section implies department responsibility for programming content. Program design, production, and use are the responsibility of the program-sponsoring agency or other entity, not the department.

History.

(E.O. No. 50 § 9 (1981); am § 10 ch 53 SLA 1987; E.O. No. 66 § 4 (1987); am § 8 ch 134 SLA 1990; am § 25 ch 126 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 113 § 15 (2005))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.21.230. Renumbered in 1981.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 44.21.320.
Telecommunications operations.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, the department may, consistent with the provisions of AS

44.21.310(a)(5)

plan, design, construct, manage, and operate all telecommunications systems owned or leased by state agencies;

manage centrex and other telephone-related services of state agencies;

be responsible generally for telecommunications systems and design for state agencies; and

coordinate with state agencies in performing their data and word processing tasks.

Within the limits of available financing, the department shall administer and operate the satellite television project, by

coordinating with the satellite television user groups and entities; and

providing liaison, management support, and technical assistance for the satellite television project.

Decisions and policies relating to programming under the satellite television project, including scheduling and allocation policies, may not be made by the department, but may only be made by a network that is representative of participating rural television users, by commercial broadcast users, or by other affected participating user groups and entities under procedures provided by statute or, if no statute applies, then by agreement of the affected user networks or groups. The department shall assist users in preparing agreements that may be required under this subsection.

The department may not engage in any activity that interferes with a contract or program right relating to commercial television programming, including but not limited to any right protected by copyright.

Nothing in AS

44.21.305

—

44.21.330

prohibits a state agency from developing telecommunications systems within its own agency if the agency is in compliance with the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner and with the agency’s own information systems plan and if the commissioner gives written authorization for the agency to engage in its own design, development, management, or operation. The commissioner may authorize independent development only upon a showing of necessity.

A state agency authorized to develop an internal telecommunications system shall, whenever feasible, coordinate its design development, management, and operation with the department.

History.

(E.O. No. 50 § 9 (1981); am §§ 2 — 5 ch 11 SLA 1985; am § 11 ch 53 SLA 1987; E.O. No. 66 § 5 (1987); am § 9 ch 134 SLA 1990; am § 26 ch 126 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 113 §§ 16, 17 (2005))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.21.240

. Renumbered in 1981. As amended in 1987 the internal reference in the introductory language of (a) of this section read “(f) of this section.” It was changed to “(d) of this section” to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 44.21.330.
Definitions.

In AS

44.21.305

—

44.21.330

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of administration;

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“public broadcasting” means the delivery of radio or television noncommercial programming intended for the general public by any method of telecommunications;

“public telecommunications” means telecommunications which serve public broadcasting, general educational, instructional, medical, safety, emergency, or public participation functions;

“state agencies” means all departments, divisions, and offices in the executive branch of state government; it does not mean an agency of the legislative or judicial branch of government or the University of Alaska;

“telecommunications” means the transmission and reception of messages, impressions, pictures, and signals by means of electromagnetic transmission with or without benefit of a closed transmission medium including all instrumentalities, facilities, apparatus, and services, whether conveyed by cable or wire, radiated through space, or transmitted through other media within a specified area or between designated points;

“telecommunications systems” means those systems in which the principal service and functions are telecommunications.

History.

(E.O. No. 50 § 9 (1981); am E.O. No. 66 § 6 (1987))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.21.250. Renumbered in 1981.